Utah statutes.
59-2-1605.   Accounting records for levies.

Each county shall separately budget and account for the use of any money received or expended under a levy imposed under Section 59-2-1602, 59-2-1603, or 59-2-1604.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 330, 2008 General Session

